Tennessee, session 114, HB0899.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 47, Chapter 18, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
47-18-5801.
As used in this part:
(1) "Cloud seeding" means a method of weather modification for the
purpose of directing rainfall to a specific location by a process of injecting,
releasing, or dispersing chemicals into the atmosphere by any means;
(2) "Weather modification" means an activity or service performed by a
public or private entity with the expressed purpose of changing the composition,
behavior, or dynamics of the atmosphere; and
(3) "Weather-related company" means a public or private entity that
offers as a service weather forecasting, modeling and data analysis, atmospheric
and environmental assessments, weather modification, or cloud seeding.
47-18-5802.
It is unlawful for a weather-related company to do any of the following in this
state:
(1) Seeding or dispersing of any substance into clouds or fog, to alter
drop size distribution, produce ice crystals or coagulation of droplets, alter the
HB0899
000655
- 1 -

development of hail or lightning, or influence in any way the natural development
cycle of clouds or their environment;
(2) Using fires or heat sources to influence convective circulation or
evaporate fog;
(3) Modifying the solar radiation exchange of the earth or clouds through
the release of gases, dusts, liquids, or aerosols into the atmosphere; or
(4) Modifying the characteristics of land or water surfaces by dusting or
treating the surfaces with powders, liquid sprays, dyes, or other materials.
47-18-5803.
A violation of this part constitutes a violation of the Tennessee Consumer
Protection Act of 1977, compiled in part 1 of this chapter. A violation of this part
constitutes an unfair or deceptive act or practice affecting trade or commerce and is
subject to the penalties and remedies as provided in the Tennessee Consumer
Protection Act of 1977.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-18-104(b), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Violating § 47-18-5802;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect on July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000655